Alaska, session 34, HB103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 23.30.121(b) is amended to read: 05 (b) For a firefighter covered under AS 23.30.243, 06 (1) there is a presumption that a claim for compensation for disability 07 as a result of the following diseases is within the provisions of this chapter: 08 (A) respiratory disease; 09 (B) cardiovascular events that are experienced within 72 hours 10 after exposure to smoke, fumes, or toxic substances; and 11 (C) the following cancers: 12 (i) primary brain cancer; 13 (ii) malignant melanoma; 14 (iii) leukemia; 01 (iv) non-Hodgkin's lymphoma; 02 (v) bladder cancer; 03 (vi) ureter cancer; 04 (vii) kidney cancer; 05 (viii) prostate cancer; and 06 (ix) breast cancer; 07 (2) notwithstanding AS 23.30.100(a), following termination of service, 08 the presumption established in (1) of this subsection extends to the firefighter for a 09 period of three calendar months for each year of requisite service but may not extend 10 more than 60 calendar months following the last date of employment; 11 (3) the presumption established in (1) of this subsection applies only to 12 an active or former firefighter who has a disease described in (1) of this subsection 13 that develops or manifests itself after the firefighter has served in the state for at least 14 six [SEVEN] years and who 15 (A) underwent [WAS GIVEN] a qualifying medical 16 examination 17 (i) upon the first employment as [BECOMING] a 18 firefighter that did not show evidence of the disease; 19 (ii) at least once every two years [(B) WAS GIVEN 20 AN ANNUAL MEDICAL EXAM] during [EACH OF] the first six 21 [SEVEN] years of employment as a firefighter that did not show 22 evidence of the disease; and 23 (B) [(C)] with regard to diseases described in (1)(C) of this 24 subsection, demonstrates that, while in the course of employment as a 25 firefighter, the firefighter was exposed to a known carcinogen, as defined by 26 the International Agency for Research on Cancer or the National Toxicology 27 Program, and the carcinogen is associated with a disabling cancer. 28 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.